Illinois, session 104th, SB1243.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The General Assembly Organization Act is 5amended by adding Section 3.3 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 5/3.3 new)7    Sec. 3.3. Midnight legislation prohibition. 8Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 9beginning on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 10103rd General Assembly, neither house of the General Assembly 11shall consider or take a vote on any legislation between the 12hours of 12:00 a.m. and 6:00 a.m., on any day of the week 13during any regular or special session of the General Assembly, 14unless approved by the leaders of each of the caucuses of that 15house. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.